District of Columbia statutes.
5-207

Rules and regulations.

The Secretary of the Interior, with the approval or concurrence of the head of the agency having jurisdiction or control of any road, park, parkway, or other federal reservation, or his duly authorized representative, is hereby authorized to make all needful rules and regulations for the regulation of traffic, for the protection of persons, property, health, and morals, to prevent breaches of the peace, to suppress affrays and unlawful assemblies and to aid in the enforcement of any of the rules and regulations so promulgated. To any rule or regulation there may be attached a reasonable penalty for the violation thereof not exceeding, however, a fine of not more than $500, imprisonment for not exceeding 6 months, or both.

History

Mar. 17, 1948, 62 Stat. 81, ch. 136, § 2

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-207.
1973 Ed., § 4-210.